Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-2,139
Foreign nonprofit domestication
and conversion.

(MBCA
9.40) A foreign nonprofit corporation may become a domestic business corporation
if the domestication and conversion is permitted by the organic law of the
foreign nonprofit corporation.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 139.